Nebraska, session 109, LB330.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB330 LB330
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-2701.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
77-2701.02 Pursuant to section 77-2715.01:
(1) Until July 1, 1998, the rate of the sales tax levied pursuant to
section 77-2703 shall be five percent;
(2) Commencing July 1, 1998, and until July 1, 1999, the rate of the
sales tax levied pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be four and one-half
percent;
(3) Commencing July 1, 1999, and until the start of the first
calendar quarter after July 20, 2002, the rate of the sales tax levied
pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five percent;
(4) Commencing on the start of the first calendar quarter after July
20, 2002, and until July 1, 2023, the rate of the sales tax levied
pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five and one-half percent;
(5) Commencing July 1, 2023, and until July 1, 2024, the rate of the
sales tax levied pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five and one-half
percent, except that such rate shall be two and three-quarters percent on
transactions occurring within a good life district as defined in section
77-4403; and
(6) Commencing July 1, 2024, and until October 1, 2025, the rate of
the sales tax levied pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five and one-
half percent, except that such rate shall be two and three-quarters
percent on transactions that occur within that portion of a good life
district established pursuant to the Good Life Transformational Projects
Act which is located within the corporate limits of a city or village;
and .
(7) Commencing October 1, 2025, the rate of the sales tax levied
pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five percent, except that such rate
shall be (a) two and three-quarters percent on transactions that occur
within that portion of a good life district established pursuant to the
Good Life Transformational Projects Act which is located within the
-2-

LB330 LB330
2025 2025
corporate limits of a city or village and (b) fifteen and one-half
percent on sales of alcoholic liquor as defined in section 53-103.02.
Sec. 2. Section 77-27,132, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-27,132 (1) There is hereby created a fund to be designated the
Revenue Distribution Fund which shall be set apart and maintained by the
Tax Commissioner. Revenue not required to be credited to the General Fund
or any other specified fund may be credited to the Revenue Distribution
Fund. Credits and refunds of such revenue shall be paid from the Revenue
Distribution Fund. The balance of the amount credited, after credits and
refunds, shall be allocated as provided by the statutes creating such
revenue.
(2) The Tax Commissioner shall pay to a depository bank designated
by the State Treasurer all amounts collected under the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967. The Tax Commissioner shall present to the State Treasurer
bank receipts showing amounts so deposited in the bank, and of the
amounts so deposited the State Treasurer shall:
(a)(i) For transactions occurring on or after October 1, 2014, and
before July 1, 2024, credit to the Game and Parks Commission Capital
Maintenance Fund all of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes imposed
pursuant to section 77-2703 on the sale or lease of motorboats as defined
in section 37-1204, personal watercraft as defined in section 37-1204.01,
all-terrain vehicles as defined in section 60-103, and utility-type
vehicles as defined in section 60-135.01; and
(ii) For transactions occurring on or after July 1, 2024, credit to
the Game and Parks Commission Capital Maintenance Fund all of the
proceeds of the sales and use taxes imposed pursuant to section 77-2703
on the sale or lease of motorboats as defined in section 37-1204,
personal watercraft as defined in section 37-1204.01, all-terrain
vehicles as defined in section 60-103, and utility-type vehicles as
defined in section 60-135.01, and from such proceeds, transfers shall be
-3-

LB330 LB330
2025 2025
made to the Nebraska Emergency Medical System Operations Fund as provided
in section 37-327.02;
(b) Credit to the Highway Trust Fund all of the proceeds of the
sales and use taxes derived from the sale or lease for periods of more
than thirty-one days of motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers,
except that the proceeds equal to a any sales tax rate of one-half of one
percent provided for in section 77-2701.02 that is in excess of five
percent derived from the sale or lease for periods of more than thirty-
one days of motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers shall be credited
to the Highway Allocation Fund;
(c) For transactions occurring on or after July 1, 2013, and before
July 1, 2042, of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes derived from
transactions other than those listed in subdivisions (2)(a), (b), and (e)
of this section from a sales tax rate of one-quarter of one percent,
credit monthly eighty-five percent to the Highway Trust Fund and fifteen
percent to the Highway Allocation Fund;
(d) Of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes derived from
transactions other than those listed in subdivisions (2)(a), (b), and (e)
of this section, credit to the Property Tax Credit Cash Fund the amount
certified under section 77-27,237, if any such certification is made; and
(e) For transactions occurring on or after July 1, 2023, credit to
the Department of Transportation Aeronautics Capital Improvement Fund all
of the proceeds of the sales and use taxes imposed pursuant to section
77-2703 on the sale or lease of aircraft as defined in section 3-101;
and .
(f) For transactions occurring on or after October 1, 2025, of the
proceeds of the sales and use taxes derived from the sale of alcoholic
liquor as defined in section 53-103.02, credit fifty percent to the
Alcohol Addiction Prevention and Treatment Fund and fifty percent to the
Education Future Fund. The amount to be credited under this subdivision
shall be determined quarterly by the Tax Commissioner.
-4-

LB330 LB330
2025 2025
The balance of all amounts collected under the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967 shall be credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 3. Section 77-4405, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-4405 (1) If the department finds that creation of the good life
district would not exceed the limits prescribed in subsection (4) of
section 77-4404 and the project described in the application meets the
eligibility requirements of this section, the application shall be
approved.
(2) A project is eligible if:
(a) The applicant demonstrates that the total new development costs
of the project will exceed:
(i) One billion dollars if the project will be located in a city of
the metropolitan class;
(ii) Seven hundred fifty million dollars if the project will be
located in a city of the primary class;
(iii) Five hundred million dollars if the project will be located in
a city of the first class, city of the second class, or village within a
county with a population of one hundred thousand inhabitants or more; or
(iv) One hundred million dollars if the project will be located in a
city of the first class, city of the second class, village, or sanitary
and improvement district within a county with a population of less than
one hundred thousand inhabitants;
(b) The applicant demonstrates that the project will directly or
indirectly result in the creation of:
(i) One thousand new jobs if the project will be located in a city
of the metropolitan class;
(ii) Five hundred new jobs if the project will be located in a city
of the primary class;
(iii) Two hundred fifty new jobs if the project will be located in a
city of the first class, city of the second class, or village within a
-5-

LB330 LB330
2025 2025
county with a population of one hundred thousand inhabitants or more; or
(iv) Fifty new jobs if the project will be located in a city of the
first class, city of the second class, village, or sanitary and
improvement district within a county with a population of less than one
hundred thousand inhabitants; and
(c)(i) For a project that will be located in a county with a
population of one hundred thousand inhabitants or more, the applicant
demonstrates that, upon completion of the project, at least twenty
percent of sales at the project will be made to persons residing outside
the State of Nebraska or the project will generate a minimum of six
hundred thousand visitors per year who reside outside the State of
Nebraska and the project will attract new-to-market retail to the state
and will generate a minimum of three million visitors per year. Students
from another state who attend a Nebraska public or private university
shall not be counted as out-of-state residents for purposes of this
subdivision; or
(ii) For a project that will be located in a county with a
population of less than one hundred thousand inhabitants, the applicant
demonstrates that, upon completion of the project, at least twenty
percent of sales at the project will be made to persons residing outside
the State of Nebraska. Students from another state who attend a Nebraska
public or private university shall not be counted as out-of-state
residents for purposes of this subdivision.
(3) The applicant must certify that any anticipated diversion of
state sales tax revenue will be offset or exceeded by sales tax paid on
anticipated development costs, including construction to real property,
during the same period.
(4) A project is not eligible if:
(a) The project includes a licensed racetrack enclosure or an
authorized gaming operator as such terms are defined in section 9-1103,
except that this subdivision shall not apply to infrastructure or
-6-

LB330 LB330
2025 2025
facilities that are (i) publicly owned or (ii) used by or at the
direction of the Nebraska State Fair Board, so long as no gaming devices
or games of chance are expected to be operated by an authorized gaming
operator within any such facilities;
(b) The project received funds pursuant to the Shovel-Ready Capital
Recovery and Investment Act or the Economic Recovery Act, except that
this subdivision shall not apply to any project located in a qualified
inland port district; or
(c) The project includes any portion of a public or private
university.
(5) Approval of an application under this section shall establish
the good life district as that area depicted in the map accompanying the
application as submitted pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of section
77-4404. Such district shall last for thirty years and shall not exceed
two thousand acres in size if in a city of the metropolitan class, three
thousand acres in size if in any other class of city or village, or, for
any good life district created within a qualified inland port district,
the size of the qualified inland port district.
(6)(a) Prior to July 1, 2024, any transactions occurring within a
good life district shall be subject to a reduced state sales tax rate as
provided in subdivision (5) of section 77-2701.02.
(b) On and after July 1, 2024, and prior to October 1, 2025, any
transactions occurring within a good life district shall be subject to a
reduced state sales tax rate as provided in subdivision (6) of section
77-2701.02.
(c) On and after October 1, 2025, any transactions occurring within
a good life district shall be subject to a reduced state sales tax rate
as provided in subdivision (7) of section 77-2701.02.
(7) After establishment of a good life district pursuant to this
section, a good life district applicant may adjust the boundaries of the
district by filing an amended map with the department and updates or
-7-

LB330 LB330
2025 2025
supplements to the application materials originally submitted by the good
life district applicant to demonstrate the eligibility criteria in
subsection (2) of this section will be met after the boundaries are
adjusted. The department shall approve the new boundaries on the
following conditions:
(a) The department determines that the eligibility criteria in
subsection (2) of this section will continue to be met after the proposed
boundary adjustment based on the materials submitted by the good life
district applicant; and
(b) For any area being removed from the district:
(i) The department shall solicit and receive from the city or
village in which all or a portion of the good life district is located
confirmation that no area being removed is attributable to local sources
of revenue which have been pledged for payment of bonds issued pursuant
to the Good Life District Economic Development Act. Confirmation may
include resolutions, meeting minutes, or other official measures adopted
or taken by the city council or village board of trustees; and
(ii) Either the department has received written consent from the
owners of real estate proposed to be removed from the good life district,
or a hearing is held by the department in the manner described in this
subdivision and the department finds that the removal of the affected
property is in the best interests of the state and that the removal is
consistent with the goals and purposes of the approved application for
the good life district. In determining whether removal of the affected
property is consistent with the goals and purposes of the approved
application for the good life district, the department may consider any
formal action taken by the city council or village board of trustees.
Proof of such formal action may include resolutions, meeting minutes, or
other official measures adopted or taken. Such hearing must be held at
least ninety days after delivering written notice via certified mail to
the owners of record for the affected real estate proposed to be removed
-8-

LB330 LB330
2025 2025
from the good life district. The hearing must be open to the public and
for the stated purpose of hearing testimony regarding the proposed
removal of property from the good life district. Attendees must be given
the opportunity to speak and submit documentary evidence at, prior to, or
contemporaneously with such hearing for the department to consider in
making its findings.
(8) After establishment of a good life district pursuant to this
section, but within twelve months after the approval of the original
application or after any modification is made to the boundaries of a good
life district pursuant to this section, a city or village in which any
part of the applicable good life district is located may file a
supplemental request to the department to increase the size of the good
life district by up to one thousand acres. Such supplemental request
shall be accompanied by such materials and certifications necessary to
demonstrate that such increase would not negatively impact the criteria
that were necessary for the original establishment of such good life
district.
(9) After establishment of a good life district pursuant to this
section and after any modification is made to the boundaries of a good
life district pursuant to this section, the department shall transmit to
any city or village which includes such good life district within its
boundaries or within its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction (a) all
information held by the department related to the application and
approval of the application, (b) all documentation which describes the
property included within the good life district, and (c) all
documentation transmitted to the applicant for such good life district
with approval of the application and establishment of the good life
district. Such city or village shall be subject to the same
confidentiality restrictions as provided in subsection (3) of section
77-4404, except that all such documents, plans, and specifications
included in the application which the city or village determine define or
-9-

LB330 LB330
2025 2025
describe the project may be provided upon written request of any person
who owns property in the applicable good life district.
(10) After establishment of a good life district that exceeds one
thousand acres in size, the good life district applicant may apply to the
department to establish development and design standards for the good
life district. Such standards may include, but are not limited to,
standards for architectural design, landscape design, construction
materials, and sustainability, but may not require property owners to
utilize specific contractors, professionals, suppliers, or service
providers. The department may approve the standards after holding a
hearing after one hundred eighty days' notice to all property owners in
the district if the department finds that the standards will ensure a
comprehensive and cohesive character and aesthetic for development in the
good life district, and that the standards will further the purposes of
the Good Life Transformational Projects Act. The development and design
standards must be commercially reasonable and consistent with terminology
and accepted practices in the architecture industry, must not conflict
with any building code or other similar law or regulation, and must not
impose an undue burden on property owners in the district. If approved,
the standards shall apply to all new construction inside of the good life
district. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any such standards established
by the department shall be in addition and supplemental to any local
zoning, building code, comprehensive plan, or similar requirements of the
city or village, which requirements of the city or village shall control
to the extent of any conflict with any design standards established by
the department.
(11) Demonstration of meeting the required new development costs for
purposes of subdivision (2)(a) of this section may be established by
evidence submitted by the good life district applicant, the city or
village where the good life district is located, or any other person
which submits satisfactory evidence to the department.
-10-

LB330 LB330
2025 2025
Sec. 4. The Alcohol Addiction Prevention and Treatment Fund is
hereby created. The fund shall be administered by the Department of
Health and Human Services and shall consist of money transferred pursuant
to section 77-27,132. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act. The fund shall be used by the department for the prevention and
treatment of alcohol addiction.
Sec. 5. Original sections 77-2701.02, 77-27,132, and 77-4405,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-11-